Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 21.

Connection or Reconnection of Utility Services Based on Type or Source of Energy Prohibited

7-51-2101. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Policy” means an ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, or any other requirement imposed by a political subdivision of this state; and

“Political subdivision” means a municipality; public corporation; body politic; authority; district; metropolitan government; county; agency, department, or board of the aforementioned entities; or any other form of local government.

Acts 2020, ch. 591, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 591, § 3. March 20, 2020.

7-51-2102. Prohibited policies.

A political subdivision of this state shall not adopt a policy that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, the connection or reconnection of a utility service based upon the type or source of energy to be delivered to an individual customer.

This section does not limit the ability of a political subdivision:

To choose utility services for properties owned by the political subdivision; or

To comply with the terms and conditions of a contract between the political subdivision and the Tennessee Valley authority.

Acts 2020, ch. 591, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 591, § 3. March 20, 2020.

7-51-2103. Conflict with federal law.

If this part conflicts with federal law requirements pertaining to the connection or reconnection of a utility service based upon the type or source of energy to be delivered to an individual customer, then the federal law controls.

Acts 2020, ch. 591, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 591, § 3. March 20, 2020.